District of Columbia statutes.
47-2210

Returns and payment of tax.

The provisions of §§ 47-2015, 47-2016, 47-2017, and 47-2018 are hereby incorporated in and made applicable to this chapter. Every vendor, and every vendor or retailer not engaging in business in the District who is expressly authorized to pay the tax, shall file returns and pay the tax in accordance with the provisions of such sections applicable to the filing of returns and the payment of the tax and as shall be prescribed by regulation.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 127, ch. 146, title II, § 220
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2210.
1973 Ed., § 47-2710.